Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
PART 4
HIGH SCHOOL REGISTRATION

Editor's note:

The addition of this part 4 by House Bill 92-1317 and the repeal and reenactment of this article by House Bill 92-1333 were harmonized.

1-2-401. Legislative declaration.

It is the intent of the general assembly that, in order to promote and encourage voter registration of all eligible electors in the state, registration should be made as convenient as possible. It is determined by the general assembly that if voter registration is convenient, the number of registered voters will increase. It is further determined by the general assembly that support and cooperation of school officials and interested citizens will make high school registration successful. It is therefore the purpose of this part 4 to encourage voter registration by providing convenient registration procedures for qualified high school students, employees, and other persons by using high school deputy registrars.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire part added, p. 621, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 1403, § 25, effective July 1.

1-2-402. Registration by high school deputy registrars - rules.

Each principal of a public high school, or the principal's designee who is a registered voter in the county, may serve as a deputy registrar. The principal of each high school shall notify the county clerk and recorder of the county in which the high school is located of the name of the school's deputy registrar, and the county clerk and recorder shall maintain a list of the names of all of the high school deputy registrars in that county in a public file.

The high school deputy registrar may register or preregister any student, employee of the school, other person who attends school functions, or any other person who is eligible to register or preregister to vote. Voter registration may be made available only when the school is open for classes or any other school or community function. The high school deputy registrar shall take registrations or preregistrations only on school district premises.

A high school deputy registrar may have available an official application form for voter registration for each student who is eighteen years of age or who will be eighteen years of age at the time of the next election. A high school deputy registrar may have available an official application form for preregistration for each student who is sixteen years of age.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire part added, p. 621, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 1403, § 26, effective July 1.

L. 2019:

(2) and (3) amended, (HB 19-1278), ch. 326, p. 3008, § 10, effective August 2.

Cross references:

For the short title ("Colorado Votes Act") in HB 19-1278, see section 1 of chapter 326, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.

1-2-403. Training and registration materials for high school deputy registrars - processing applications.

The county clerk and recorder shall train and supervise the high school deputy registrars, and, after training is completed, shall administer the oath of office to the high school deputy registrars.

The county clerk and recorder shall issue sufficient materials to each high school deputy registrar for the registration or preregistration of all eligible students, employees, and other persons at the high school which the high school deputy registrar serves. The high school deputy registrar shall give a receipt to the county clerk and recorder for all materials issued.

The high school deputy registrar shall stamp the application for registration or preregistration with a validation stamp and provide the applicant with a receipt verifying the application.

Except as provided in subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (b), the high school deputy registrar shall forward applications and changes on a weekly basis to the county clerk and recorder of the county in which the high school is located.

During the last week allowed for registration applications submitted by mail prior to any election, the high school deputy registrar shall forward applications daily to the county clerk and recorder of the county in which the high school is located.

Within eight days prior to an election, a high school deputy registrar shall accept an application tendered under this section and shall immediately inform the applicant that, to vote in the upcoming election, the voter must go to a voter service and polling center.

Upon receipt of an application, the county clerk and recorder shall determine if the application is complete. If the county clerk and recorder determines that the application is complete, the applicant shall be deemed registered or preregistered as of the date of application. If the county clerk and recorder determines that the application is not complete, the county clerk and recorder shall notify the applicant, stating the additional information required. The applicant shall be deemed registered or preregistered as of the date of application when the additional information is provided any time prior to the actual voting.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire part added, p. 622, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 93:

(1), (2), and (3) amended, p. 1404, § 27, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(3) amended, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 698, § 22, effective May 10.

L. 2014:

(3)(b)(II)(B) amended, (SB 14-161), ch. 160, p. 559, § 8, effective May 9.

L. 2019:

(2), (3)(a), and (4) amended, (HB 19-1278), ch. 326, p. 3008, § 11, effective August 2.

Cross references:

(1) In 2013, subsection (3) was amended by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

(2) For the short title ("Colorado Votes Act") in HB 19-1278, see section 1 of chapter 326, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.